Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2360.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) (1) To verify eligibility for the food assistance program
pursuant to K.S.A. 39-709, and amendments thereto, the secretary for
children and families and the secretary of health and environment shall:
(A) Enter into data matching agreements to compare data related to
households enrolled in food assistance, child support services, medicaid
and other public assistance programs with commercial entities that collect
or maintain data regarding employment and wages as a "payroll data
provider" as defined by the fair credit reporting act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681 et
seq., as in effect on July 1, 2025, to obtain real-time employment and
income data, including up-to-date, non- modeled employment and income
data provided by employers or payroll providers; or
(B) present to the legislative coordinating council prior to November
1, 2025, commercial, state and federal agency options to compare data
options. Upon receipt and review of such options from the secretary for
children and families and the secretary of health and environment, the
legislative coordinating council shall make the determination of approval
of the data matching agreement.
(2) The appropriate secretary shall receive and review data
concerning individuals or households enrolled in food assistance, child
support services, medicaid and other public assistance programs that
indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for a public
assistance program on at least a:
(A) Monthly basis, from the office of vital statistics, including, but
not limited to, death records;
(B) quarterly basis, from the department of labor, including, but not
limited to, changes in employment or wages;
(C) monthly basis, including, but not limited to, potential changes in

HB 2360 2
residency as identified by out-of-state electronic benefit transfer
transactions;
(D) quarterly basis, from the department of revenue, including, but
not limited to, potential changes in income, wages or residency as
identified by tax records;
(E) monthly basis, from the department of corrections, including, but
not limited to, incarceration status;
(F) semi-monthly basis, from the department of labor, including, but
not limited to, potential changes in employment, income or assets; and
(G) monthly basis, from the Kansas lottery and the Kansas racing and
gaming commission, to identify households with lottery or gambling
winnings of $3,000 or greater and, to the extent permissible under federal
law, deem the data verified upon receipt, and if such data is not verified
upon receipt, the department shall make referrals for further investigation
to identify households with winnings equal to or greater than the resource
limit for elderly or disabled households as defined in 7 C.F.R. § 273.8(b).
(b) On at least a monthly basis, to assess continued eligibility and act
on findings, the secretary for children and families shall review and act on
the following data from federal sources:
(1) Earned income information, death records, incarceration records,
supplemental security income information, beneficiary records, earnings
information and pension information maintained by the United States
social security administration;
(2) income and employment information maintained in the national
directory of new hires and child support enforcement data maintained by
the United States department of health and human services;
(3) payment and earnings information maintained by the United
States department of housing and urban development; and
(4) fleeing felon information maintained by the United States federal
bureau of investigation.
(c) On at least a quarterly basis, the secretary shall make available to
the public on the Kansas department for children and families website data
from findings of noncompliance and fraud investigations in food
assistance for the following aggregate, nonconfidential and non-
personally identifying information:
(1) Number of households investigated for intentional program
violations or fraud;
(2) total number of households referred to the attorney general's
office for prosecution;
(3) improper payments and expenditures;
(4) moneys recovered;
(5) data concerning improper payments and ineligible recipients as a
percentage of those investigated and reviewed; and

HB 2360 3
(6) amount of funds expended by electronic benefit card transactions
in each state outside of Kansas.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.